Alabama, session 2026rs, HB547.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. This act shall be known as the Medical
Research Supply Assurance and Trade Resilience Act.
Page 1

Research Supply Assurance and Trade Resilience Act.
HB547 INTRODUCED
Section 2. As used in this act, unless otherwise
specified or unless the context requires otherwise, the
following terms will have the following meanings:
(1) DEPARTMENT. The Alabama Department of Public
Health.
(2) ELIGIBLE INSTITUTION. Any of the following
institutions:
a. A hospital meeting the definition found in Section
22-21-20(1), Code of Alabama 1975.
b. A research university operating within the state.
c. A biotechnology company operating within the state.
d. A health care facility meeting the definition found
in Section 22-21-260(6), Code of Alabama 1975.
(3) TRADE DISRUPTION. Any period in which the average
tariff on medical or research materials is over five percent.
Section 3. (a) The department shall establish the
Essential Medical Supply Resilience Grant Program.
(b) The department may establish priorities,
guidelines, standards, and processes by which grants may be
awarded.
(c) Grants may be awarded to eligible institutions
experiencing increased costs, delays, or shortages related to
global trade instability.
(d) The department shall require interested eligible
institutions to complete applications on forms issued by the
department that will substantiate the eligible institution's
need for the grant.
(e) Funds may be used for substitute sourcing,
Page 2

(e) Funds may be used for substitute sourcing,
HB547 INTRODUCED
stockpiling, domestic supplier development, or related
mitigation strategies.
Section 4. (a) The department shall support efforts to:
(1) Identify critical imported biomedical inputs
subject to trade risks;
(2) Facilitate research into domestic or tariff-neutral
substitutes; and
(3) Promote partnerships with in-state manufacturers to
produce essential inputs.
(b) Grants under the Essential Medical Supply
Resilience Grant Program and technical assistance to eligible
institutions shall be prioritized for those institutions
facing the highest exposure to trade disruptions.
Section 5. (a) The department shall create and maintain
a strategic reserve of essential research and clinical
supplies.
(b) The reserve shall include reagents, personal
protective equipment, diagnostic kits, and lab consumables.
(c) Eligible institutions may request access to the
reserve during periods of documented international trade
disruption.
Section 6. (a) The department shall provide support to
eligible institutions in:
(1) Navigating customs clearance and import licensing;
(2) Understanding international health material
regulations; and
(3) Mitigating impacts of export controls or
retaliatory tariffs on biomedical goods.
Page 3

retaliatory tariffs on biomedical goods.
HB547 INTRODUCED
(b) The department may collaborate with federal
agencies to expedite resolution of customs or licensing
barriers.
Section 7. (a) The Medical Supply Chain Vulnerability
Advisory Board is established and shall:
(1) Assess the resilience of critical health care and
research supply chains.
(2) Recommend policy actions to reduce reliance on
vulnerable imports.
(3) Issue annual reports to the executive and
legislative branches.
(b) The board shall consist of five members. There will
be one member appointed by each of the following authorities:
(1) The Governor.
(2) The President Pro Tempore of the Senate.
100 (3) The Speaker of the House of Representatives.
101 (4) The Senate Minority Leader.
102 (5) The House of Representatives Minority Leader.
103 (c)(1) The appointing authorities shall each appoint
104 one initial member to the board for a term of two years.
105 (2) The appointing authorities should work to
106 coordinate their appointments so that there is at least one
107 member from the following groups:
108 a. Supply chain experts.
109 b. Medical professionals.
110 c. Academic researchers.
111 d. Agency representatives.
112 (3) Members subsequently appointed to the board shall
Page 4

(3) Members subsequently appointed to the board shall
HB547 INTRODUCED
113 each serve a term of four years.
114 (4) The members of the board shall serve without
115 compensation but may be reimbursed for necessary expenses in
116 attending meetings of the board pursuant to the policies of
117 his or her respective appointing authority.
118 (5) The membership of the board shall be inclusive and
119 reflect the racial, gender, geographic, urban/rural, and
120 economic diversity of the state.
121 Section 8. (a) There is hereby created and there shall
122 be a fund which shall be known as the Medical Research Supply
123 Assurance and Trade Resilience Program Fund in the State
124 Treasury for providing grants pursuant to this act.
125 (b) The fund shall consist of gifts, grants, federal
126 funds, or legislative appropriations for purposes of
127 administering the act and providing funding for grants,
128 supplies, and strategic reserve facilities.
129 (c) Amounts in the fund shall be budgeted and allotted
130 in accordance with Sections 41-4-80 through 41-4-69 and
131 Sections 41-19-1 through 41-19-12, Code of Alabama 1975.
132 Section 9. The department shall adopt rules necessary
133 to implement, administer, and facilitate this act.
134 Section 10. This act shall become effective on October
135 1, 2026.
Page 5